Illinois, session 104th, HB3522.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Public 5University Direct Admission Program Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds all of the 7following:8        (1) Illinois has a strong system of public higher 9    education, including public universities and community 10    colleges across the State.11        (2) The Illinois economy thrives when Illinois 12    students choose to pursue postsecondary education at 13    Illinois institutions of higher education.14        (3) According to the National Bureau of Economic 15    Research, two-thirds of graduates stay and work in the 16    state in which they matriculated.17        (4) Students who have been historically underserved, 18    such as students who are the first in their families to go 19    to college, students who come from low-income families or 20    communities, students of color, and students from rural 21    communities, among others, often face the greatest 22    barriers to accessing higher education, in part because of 23    a lack of information.  HB3522 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1        (5) Every eligible high school senior in Illinois 2    should receive an offer to an Illinois institution of 3    higher education, including public universities and 4    community colleges.5        (6) Every public community college student seeking a 6    transfer pathway who meets the requirements should receive 7    an offer to a public university in Illinois.8        (7) Illinois can and should develop the tools and 9    technology and partner with vendors if appropriate to 10    dramatically simplify the public university and community 11    college application and admission process for Illinois 12    students. 13    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:14    "Direct admissions information" means a student's name, 15home address, birth date, telephone number, email address, 16cumulative grade point average, and high school.17    "Public university" means the University of Illinois at 18Springfield, Southern Illinois University, Chicago State 19University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 20University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 21University, Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois 22University, or any other public university established or 23authorized by the General Assembly after the effective date of 24this Act.   HB3522 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    Section 15. Direct admission program.2    (a) The Board of Higher Education, in collaboration with 3the Illinois Community College Board, the Illinois Student 4Assistance Commission, and the State Board of Education, shall 5establish and administer a direct admission program. 6Consistent with the federal Family Educational Rights and 7Privacy Act of 1974, the Illinois School Student Records Act, 8and the School Code, the direct admission program shall 9automatically offer general admission into a public university 10or community college to qualified high school seniors in this 11State and to public community college students in this State 12who qualify to transfer to a public university.13    (b) Each public university in the direct admission program 14shall identify and provide its grade point average standards 15for general admission for first time admission and for 16transfer students to the Illinois Student Assistance 17Commission by March 1 of each year. The Illinois Student 18Assistance Commission, in collaboration with the Board of 19Higher Education and the Illinois Community College Board, may 20determine which students meet the standards for general 21admission for each public university in the direct admission 22program, and that information shall be made available to the 23Board of Higher Education as needed for the administration of 24the program. The Board of Higher Education, the Illinois 25Student Assistance Commission, or a statewide student 26application portal, as provided in subsections (g) and (h),   HB3522 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1shall notify the student and each public university for which 2the student qualifies. Each public university and community 3college may also notify qualified students.4    (c) Beginning July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter, the 5Illinois Student Assistance Commission shall use data 6collected from school districts pursuant to Section 10-20.5a 7and paragraph 16 of Section 34-18 of the School Code for 8purposes of subsection (b) to determine which students meet 9the standards for general admission and may provide the data 10to the Board of Higher Education.11    (d) As all public community colleges in this State are 12open-access institutions, high school student direct 13admissions information shall be used to identify a student's 14local public community college. All correspondence to a 15student, pursuant to subsection (b), indicating the public 16universities that offer the student direct admission shall 17also indicate the student's acceptance to the community 18college. The public community college may also notify students 19within its district directly.20    (e) Under the direct admission program, a public community 21college shall offer admission to all students who are 22residents of the community college district. Under the direct 23admission program, a public university shall offer general 24admission to any high school senior in this State who meets the 25public university's standards for admission, as identified 26under subsection (b), and to any public community college   HB3522 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1transfer student transferring to a public university who meets 2all of the following requirements:3        (1) Is enrolled at a public community college in this 4    State.5        (2) Has earned a minimum of 30 graded, transferable 6    semester hours.7        (3) Meets the minimum grade point average requirement 8    as set by the public university and as reported to 9    Illinois Student Assistance Commission.10    (f) By July 1 of each year, community college districts 11shall provide, on an equal basis and consistent with the 12federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, for 13any student who has met the 30-hour transferable credit hour 14requirement set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (e), 15access to community college student direct admissions 16information to the Illinois Community College Board. The 17Illinois Community College Board shall transmit this 18information to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for 19the purpose of the direct admission program. Prior to 20providing the student's direct admissions information and 21transferable credit hours, each community college district 22shall receive the written or electronic consent of the student 23if the student is 18 years of age or older or the student's 24parent of guardian if the student is younger than 18 years of 25age. Community college students are encouraged to consult the 26Illinois Articulation Initiative General Education Core   HB3522 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1Curriculum course list and other resources at the State and 2university level to determine course transferability for 3purposes of paragraph (2) of subsection (e). Community college 4students who have not completed a degree prior to transfer 5shall be notified by the public university in which they are 6enrolled to consult the Student Transfer Achievement Reform 7Act to determine if they are eligible for reverse transfer of 8credits for the purpose of obtaining an associate degree.9    (g) The Illinois Student Assistance Commission may gather 10data and develop the technology to automatically notify high 11school seniors in this State and public community college 12transfer students of the direct admission program for the 13public universities for which those students qualify, based on 14the standards submitted under subsection (b) or, in the case 15of public community colleges, based on the community college 16district where those students reside.17    (h) The Illinois Student Assistance Commission may use the 18services of a statewide student application portal and 19aggregator to provide the automatic notification in subsection 20(g). The notification shall include the student's local public 21community college, consistent with the requirements in 22subsection (d).23    (i) The direct admission program shall provide admitted 24high school seniors in this State and public community college 25transfer students with the website address for the Illinois 26Student Assistance Commission to find information regarding   HB3522 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1State grant programs, support for financial aid application 2completion, scholarship searches, and other financial 3aid-related information and shall encourage students to 4determine their eligibility for financial aid by completing 5the Free Application for Federal Student Aid or, if 6applicable, an application for State financial aid.7    (j) A public university or community college may verify 8applicant information, including transcripts, Illinois 9residency, and high school graduation in determining 10eligibility for enrollment. A public university or community 11college may revoke admission if an applicant does not meet the 12public university's or community college's direct admission 13criteria as specified in this Act before enrolling at the 14public university or community college.15    (k) Students who apply to a public university or community 16college pursuant to this Act must not be required to pay an 17application fee by any public university or community college 18as part of the direct admission program.19    (l) If informed consent to the redisclosure of a student's 20direct admissions information is provided pursuant to 21subsection (b-5) of Section 10-20.5a or subparagraph (b-5) of 22paragraph 16 of Section 34-18 of the School Code, the Illinois 23Student Assistance Commission may, as needed for the 24administration of the direct admission program, redisclose the 25student's direct admissions information to the Board of Higher 26Education, the Illinois Community College Board, public   HB3522 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1universities for which the student qualifies under the direct 2admission program, the University of Illinois at 3Urbana-Champaign and the University of Illinois at Chicago if 4the student qualifies under Section 20, the community college 5district where the student resides, and, if applicable, a 6third party that operates a statewide student application 7portal. Direct admissions information may not be redisclosed 8to other entities or individuals unless informed consent to 9the redisclosure is provided pursuant to subsection (b-5) of 10Section 10-20.5a or subparagraph (b-5) of paragraph 16 of 11Section 34-18 of the School Code.12    (m) The Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Student 13Assistance Commission, and the Illinois Community College 14Board may adopt joint rules to develop procedures for the 15implementation of this Section. 16    Section 20. Access and outreach campaign. The Board of 17Higher Education, in collaboration with the Illinois Student 18Assistance Commission and the State Board of Education, shall 19develop, in consultation with the University of Illinois at 20Chicago and the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, a 21process to inform qualifying State high school seniors about 22the opportunity to apply to the University of Illinois at 23Chicago or the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. 24Qualifying students shall be identified and encouraged to 25apply in the following manner:  HB3522 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1        (1) The University of Illinois at Chicago and the 2    University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign shall determine 3    the criteria by which students shall be identified for the 4    access and outreach campaign. The University of Illinois 5    at Chicago and the University of Illinois at 6    Urbana-Champaign shall provide the qualifying criteria to 7    the Illinois Student Assistance Commission, as long as the 8    qualifying criteria is based on data available to the 9    Illinois Student Assistance Commission, by February 1 each 10    year.11        (2) The University of Illinois at Chicago and the 12    University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign shall provide 13    the Illinois Student Assistance Commission with the 14    content of the communication to be shared with students 15    describing how to request information on how to apply. The 16    Illinois Student Assistance Commission may use the same 17    portal or mechanisms for this communication as used for 18    offers of direct admission under Section 15.19        (3) The Illinois Student Assistance Commission, in 20    collaboration with the Board of Higher Education and the 21    State Board of Education as needed for the administration 22    of this Section, shall provide the University of Illinois 23    at Chicago and the University of Illinois at 24    Urbana-Champaign with the direct admissions information of 25    the students who meet the qualifying criteria defined by 26    the University of Illinois at Chicago or the University of   HB3522 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    Illinois at Urbana-Champaign.2        (4) The Board of Higher Education and the Illinois 3    Student Assistance Commission may adopt any rules 4    necessary to administer this Section. 5    Section 25. Direct admission program and access and 6outreach campaign report.7    (a)In establishing the direct admission program, the Board 8of Higher Education, in collaboration with the Illinois 9Community College Board, shall specifically evaluate the 10impact on enrollment of low-income students, students of 11color, first generation students, students from populations 12underserved in higher education, and students from rural areas 13of this State.14    (b) The Board of Higher Education shall submit a report on 15the direct admission program and the access and outreach 16campaign to the Governor and General Assembly by August 1, 172029 and each August 1 thereafter. The report shall include, 18but is not limited to, information related to implementation 19of the direct admission program, the demographic, as collected 20and available, and geographic data of students offered direct 21admission and the public university or community college to 22which direct admission was offered, the demographic, as 23collected and available, and geographic data of students who 24qualified under Section 20, those who applied, and those who 25were offered admission, the demographic, as collected and   HB3522 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1available, and geographic data of high school seniors and 2public community college transfer students who accepted direct 3admission and enrolled in the public university or public 4community college that offered that direct admission, changes 5in admissions and enrollment over time of high school seniors 6and public community college transfer students through the 7direct admission program, and recommendations to improve the 8direct admission program. The Board of Higher Education shall 9collaborate with the Illinois Community College Board, the 10State Board of Education, the Illinois Student Assistance 11Commission, and public universities to collect data necessary 12to fulfill the reporting requirements of this Section.13    (c) The Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Student 14Assistance Commission, and the Illinois Community College 15Board, may adopt any rules necessary to administer this 16Section. 17    Section 30. The School Code is amended by changing 18Sections 2-3.64a-5, 10-20.5a, and 34-18 as follows: 19    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.64a-5)20    Sec. 2-3.64a-5. State goals and assessment.21    (a) For the assessment and accountability purposes of this 22Section, "students" includes those students enrolled in a 23public or State-operated elementary school, secondary school, 24or cooperative or joint agreement with a governing body or   HB3522 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1board of control, a charter school operating in compliance 2with the Charter Schools Law, a school operated by a regional 3office of education under Section 13A-3 of this Code, or a 4public school administered by a local public agency or the 5Department of Human Services.6    (b) The State Board of Education shall establish the 7academic standards that are to be applicable to students who 8are subject to State assessments under this Section. The State 9Board of Education shall not establish any such standards in 10final form without first providing opportunities for public 11participation and local input in the development of the final 12academic standards. Those opportunities shall include a 13well-publicized period of public comment and opportunities to 14file written comments.15    (c) Beginning no later than the 2014-2015 school year, the 16State Board of Education shall annually assess all students 17enrolled in grades 3 through 8 in English language arts and 18mathematics.19    Beginning no later than the 2017-2018 school year, the 20State Board of Education shall annually assess all students in 21science at one grade in grades 3 through 5, at one grade in 22grades 6 through 8, and at one grade in grades 9 through 12.23    The State Board of Education shall annually assess schools 24that operate a secondary education program, as defined in 25Section 22-22 of this Code, in English language arts and 26mathematics. The State Board of Education shall administer no   HB3522 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1more than 3 assessments, per student, of English language arts 2and mathematics for students in a secondary education program. 3One of these assessments shall be recognized by this State's 4public institutions of higher education, as defined in the 5Board of Higher Education Act, for the purpose of student 6application or admissions consideration. The assessment 7administered by the State Board of Education for the purpose 8of student application to or admissions consideration by 9institutions of higher education must be administered on a 10school day during regular student attendance hours, and 11student profile information collected by the assessment shall, 12if available, be made available to the State's public 13institutions of higher education in a timely manner. 14    Students who do not take the State's final accountability 15assessment or its approved alternate assessment may not 16receive a regular high school diploma unless the student is 17exempted from taking the State assessments under subsection 18(d) of this Section because the student is enrolled in a 19program of adult and continuing education, as defined in the 20Adult Education Act, or the student is identified by the State 21Board of Education, through rules, as being exempt from the 22assessment.23    The State Board of Education shall not assess students 24under this Section in subjects not required by this Section.25    Districts shall inform their students of the timelines and 26procedures applicable to their participation in every yearly   HB3522 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1administration of the State assessments. The State Board of 2Education shall establish periods of time in each school year 3during which State assessments shall occur to meet the 4objectives of this Section.5    The requirements of this subsection do not apply if the 6State Board of Education has received a waiver from the 7administration of assessments from the U.S. Department of 8Education. 9    (d) Every individualized educational program as described 10in Article 14 shall identify if the State assessment or 11components thereof require accommodation for the student. The 12State Board of Education shall develop rules governing the 13administration of an alternate assessment that may be 14available to students for whom participation in this State's 15regular assessments is not appropriate, even with 16accommodations as allowed under this Section.17    Students receiving special education services whose 18individualized educational programs identify them as eligible 19for the alternative State assessments nevertheless shall have 20the option of also taking this State's regular final 21accountability assessment, which shall be administered in 22accordance with the eligible accommodations appropriate for 23meeting these students' respective needs.24    All students determined to be English learners shall 25participate in the State assessments. The scores of those 26students who have been enrolled in schools in the United   HB3522 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1States for less than 12 months may not be used for the purposes 2of accountability. Any student determined to be an English 3learner shall receive appropriate assessment accommodations, 4including language supports, which shall be established by 5rule. Approved assessment accommodations must be provided 6until the student's English language skills develop to the 7extent that the student is no longer considered to be an 8English learner, as demonstrated through a State-identified 9English language proficiency assessment.10    (e) The results or scores of each assessment taken under 11this Section shall be made available to the parents of each 12student.13    In each school year, the scores attained by a student on 14the final accountability assessment must be placed in the 15student's permanent record pursuant to rules that the State 16Board of Education shall adopt for that purpose in accordance 17with Section 3 of the Illinois School Student Records Act. In 18each school year, the scores attained by a student on the State 19assessments administered in grades 3 through 8 must be placed 20in the student's temporary record.21    (f) All schools shall administer the State's academic 22assessment of English language proficiency to all children 23determined to be English learners.24    (g) All schools in this State that are part of the sample 25drawn by the National Center for Education Statistics, in 26collaboration with their school districts and the State Board   HB3522 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1of Education, shall administer the academic assessments under 2the National Assessment of Educational Progress carried out 3under Section 411(b)(2) of the federal National Education 4Statistics Act of 1994 (20 U.S.C. 9010) if the U.S. Secretary 5of Education pays the costs of administering the assessments.6    (h) (Blank).7    (i) For the purposes of this subsection (i), "academically 8based assessments" means assessments consisting of questions 9and answers that are measurable and quantifiable to measure 10the knowledge, skills, and ability of students in the subject 11matters covered by the assessments. All assessments 12administered pursuant to this Section must be academically 13based assessments. The scoring of academically based 14assessments shall be reliable, valid, and fair and shall meet 15the guidelines for assessment development and use prescribed 16by the American Psychological Association, the National 17Council on Measurement in Education, and the American 18Educational Research Association.19    The State Board of Education shall review the use of all 20assessment item types in order to ensure that they are valid 21and reliable indicators of student performance aligned to the 22learning standards being assessed and that the development, 23administration, and scoring of these item types are 24justifiable in terms of cost.25    (j) The State Superintendent of Education shall appoint a 26committee of no more than 21 members, consisting of parents,   HB3522 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1teachers, school administrators, school board members, 2assessment experts, regional superintendents of schools, and 3citizens, to review the State assessments administered by the 4State Board of Education. The Committee shall select one of 5its members as its chairperson. The Committee shall meet on an 6ongoing basis to review the content and design of the 7assessments (including whether the requirements of subsection 8(i) of this Section have been met), the time and money expended 9at the local and State levels to prepare for and administer the 10assessments, the collective results of the assessments as 11measured against the stated purpose of assessing student 12performance, and other issues involving the assessments 13identified by the Committee. The Committee shall make periodic 14recommendations to the State Superintendent of Education and 15the General Assembly concerning the assessments. 16    (k) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to 17implement this Section.18(Source: P.A. 103-204, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.5a)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-20.5a)20    Sec. 10-20.5a. Access to high school campus. 21    (a) In this Section:22    "Direct admissions information" means a student's name, 23home address, birth date, telephone number, email address, 24cumulative grade point average, and high school. 25    "Directory information" means a high school student's   HB3522 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1name, home address, birth date, and telephone number.2    "Public institution of higher education" has the meaning 3given to that term in the Board of Higher Education Act.4    (a-3) For school districts maintaining grades 10 through 512, to provide, on an equal basis, and consistent with the 6federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 7access to a high school campus and student directory 8information to the official recruiting representatives of the 9armed forces of Illinois and the United States, to the 10Illinois Student Assistance Commission, and to State public 11institutions of higher education for the purpose of informing 12students of educational and career opportunities if the board 13has provided such access to persons or groups whose purpose is 14to acquaint students with educational or occupational 15opportunities available to them. The board is not required to 16give greater notice regarding the right of access to 17recruiting representatives than is given to other persons and 18groups. In this Section, "directory information" means a high 19school student's name, address, and telephone number.20    (a-5) For a school district maintaining grades 10 through 2112, to provide, on an equal basis and consistent with the 22federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 and 23the Illinois School Student Records Act, access to student 24direct admissions information to the Illinois Student 25Assistance Commission for the purpose of the direct admission 26program.   HB3522 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    (b) If a student or his or her parent or guardian submits a 2signed, written request to the high school before the end of 3the student's sophomore year (or if the student is a transfer 4student, by another time set by the high school) that 5indicates that the student or his or her parent or guardian 6does not want the student's directory information to be 7provided to official recruiting representatives, to the 8Illinois Student Assistance Commission, or to public 9institutions of higher education under subsection (a-3) (a) of 10this Section, the high school may not provide access to the 11student's directory information to these recruiting 12representatives, the Illinois Student Assistance Commission, 13or public institutions of higher education. The high school 14shall notify its students and their parents or guardians of 15the provisions of this subsection (b).16    (b-5) If a student who is 18 years of age or older or the 17parent or guardian of a student who is under 18 years of age 18submits a signed, written or electronic consent that indicates 19that the student or his or her parent or guardian does permit 20the student's direct admissions information to be provided 21under subsection (a-5), the high school shall provide the 22student's direct admissions information to the Illinois 23Student Assistance Commission.24    The Illinois Student Assistance Commission shall provide 25template opt-in language to those school districts maintaining 26grades 10 through 12, which shall be made available on the   HB3522 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1Commission's website no later than June 30, 2025. The template 2opt-in language shall specify that if the student or the 3student's parent or guardian consents, the student's direct 4admissions information will be sent to the Illinois Student 5Assistance Commission and the direct admissions information 6may, as needed for the administration of the direct admission 7program under the Public University Direct Admission Program 8Act, be redisclosed to the Board of Higher Education, the 9Illinois Community College Board, public universities for 10which the student qualifies under the direct admission 11program, the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign and 12the University of Illinois at Chicago if the student qualifies 13under Section 20 of the Public University Direct Admission 14Program Act, the community college district where the student 15resides, and, if applicable, a third party that operates a 16statewide student application portal. The template opt-in 17language shall also specify that direct admissions information 18may not be redisclosed to any other individual or entity 19unless the opt-in language notifies the student or the 20student's parent or guardian of such redisclosure and the 21student or the student's parent or guardian consents to the 22redisclosure.23    The high school shall notify its students and their 24parents or guardians of the provisions of this subsection 25(b-5) and, at the time of school registration or at other 26appropriate times prior to the end of a student's junior year,   HB3522 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1give its students and their parents or guardians the option 2for a student's direct admissions information to be shared for 3the purpose of the direct admission program. 4    (c) A high school may require official recruiting 5representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and the United 6States to pay a fee for copying and mailing a student's 7directory information in an amount that is not more than the 8actual costs incurred by the high school. 9    (d) Information received by an official recruiting 10representative under this Section may be used only to provide 11information to students concerning educational and career 12opportunities. Information and may not be released to a 13person who is not involved in recruiting students for the 14armed forces of Illinois or the United States or providing 15educational opportunity information for the Board of Higher 16Education, the Illinois Community College Board, the Illinois 17Student Assistance Commission, or public State institutions of 18higher education.19    (e) By July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter, each school 20district under this Section shall make high school January 1, 212024, student directory information shall be made 22electronically accessible through a secure centralized data 23system for official recruiting representatives of the armed 24forces of Illinois and the United States, as well as to the 25Illinois Student Assistance Commission and State public 26institutions of higher education.   HB3522 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    (f) By July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter, each school 2district under this Section shall make student direct 3admissions information, for students graduating in the next 4year, electronically accessible through a secure, centralized 5data system for the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for 6the purpose of the direct admission program. 7    (g) The Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Community 8College Board, the Illinois Student Assistance Commission, and 9the State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary to 10administer this Section. 11(Source: P.A. 103-204, eff. 1-1-24.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/34-18)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-18)13    Sec. 34-18. Powers of the board. The board shall exercise 14general supervision and jurisdiction over the public education 15and the public school system of the city, and, except as 16otherwise provided by this Article, shall have power:17        1. To make suitable provision for the establishment 18    and maintenance throughout the year or for such portion 19    thereof as it may direct, not less than 9 months and in 20    compliance with Section 10-19.05, of schools of all grades 21    and kinds, including normal schools, high schools, night 22    schools, schools for defectives and delinquents, parental 23    and truant schools, schools for the blind, the deaf, and 24    persons with physical disabilities, schools or classes in 25    manual training, constructural and vocational teaching,   HB3522 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    domestic arts, and physical culture, vocation and 2    extension schools and lecture courses, and all other 3    educational courses and facilities, including 4    establishing, equipping, maintaining and operating 5    playgrounds and recreational programs, when such programs 6    are conducted in, adjacent to, or connected with any 7    public school under the general supervision and 8    jurisdiction of the board; provided that the calendar for 9    the school term and any changes must be submitted to and 10    approved by the State Board of Education before the 11    calendar or changes may take effect, and provided that in 12    allocating funds from year to year for the operation of 13    all attendance centers within the district, the board 14    shall ensure that supplemental general State aid or 15    supplemental grant funds are allocated and applied in 16    accordance with Section 18-8, 18-8.05, or 18-8.15. To 17    admit to such schools without charge foreign exchange 18    students who are participants in an organized exchange 19    student program which is authorized by the board. The 20    board shall permit all students to enroll in 21    apprenticeship programs in trade schools operated by the 22    board, whether those programs are union-sponsored or not. 23    No student shall be refused admission into or be excluded 24    from any course of instruction offered in the common 25    schools by reason of that student's sex. No student shall 26    be denied equal access to physical education and   HB3522 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    interscholastic athletic programs supported from school 2    district funds or denied participation in comparable 3    physical education and athletic programs solely by reason 4    of the student's sex. Equal access to programs supported 5    from school district funds and comparable programs will be 6    defined in rules promulgated by the State Board of 7    Education in consultation with the Illinois High School 8    Association. Notwithstanding any other provision of this 9    Article, neither the board of education nor any local 10    school council or other school official shall recommend 11    that children with disabilities be placed into regular 12    education classrooms unless those children with 13    disabilities are provided with supplementary services to 14    assist them so that they benefit from the regular 15    classroom instruction and are included on the teacher's 16    regular education class register;17        2. To furnish lunches to pupils, to make a reasonable 18    charge therefor, and to use school funds for the payment 19    of such expenses as the board may determine are necessary 20    in conducting the school lunch program;21        3. To co-operate with the circuit court;22        4. To make arrangements with the public or 23    quasi-public libraries and museums for the use of their 24    facilities by teachers and pupils of the public schools;25        5. To employ dentists and prescribe their duties for 26    the purpose of treating the pupils in the schools, but   HB3522 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    accepting such treatment shall be optional with parents or 2    guardians;3        6. To grant the use of assembly halls and classrooms 4    when not otherwise needed, including light, heat, and 5    attendants, for free public lectures, concerts, and other 6    educational and social interests, free of charge, under 7    such provisions and control as the principal of the 8    affected attendance center may prescribe;9        7. To apportion the pupils to the several schools; 10    provided that no pupil shall be excluded from or 11    segregated in any such school on account of his color, 12    race, sex, or nationality. The board shall take into 13    consideration the prevention of segregation and the 14    elimination of separation of children in public schools 15    because of color, race, sex, or nationality. Except that 16    children may be committed to or attend parental and social 17    adjustment schools established and maintained either for 18    boys or girls only. All records pertaining to the 19    creation, alteration or revision of attendance areas shall 20    be open to the public. Nothing herein shall limit the 21    board's authority to establish multi-area attendance 22    centers or other student assignment systems for 23    desegregation purposes or otherwise, and to apportion the 24    pupils to the several schools. Furthermore, beginning in 25    school year 1994-95, pursuant to a board plan adopted by 26    October 1, 1993, the board shall offer, commencing on a   HB3522 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    phased-in basis, the opportunity for families within the 2    school district to apply for enrollment of their children 3    in any attendance center within the school district which 4    does not have selective admission requirements approved by 5    the board. The appropriate geographical area in which such 6    open enrollment may be exercised shall be determined by 7    the board of education. Such children may be admitted to 8    any such attendance center on a space available basis 9    after all children residing within such attendance 10    center's area have been accommodated. If the number of 11    applicants from outside the attendance area exceed the 12    space available, then successful applicants shall be 13    selected by lottery. The board of education's open 14    enrollment plan must include provisions that allow 15    low-income students to have access to transportation 16    needed to exercise school choice. Open enrollment shall be 17    in compliance with the provisions of the Consent Decree 18    and Desegregation Plan cited in Section 34-1.01;19        8. To approve programs and policies for providing 20    transportation services to students. Nothing herein shall 21    be construed to permit or empower the State Board of 22    Education to order, mandate, or require busing or other 23    transportation of pupils for the purpose of achieving 24    racial balance in any school;25        9. Subject to the limitations in this Article, to 26    establish and approve system-wide curriculum objectives   HB3522 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    and standards, including graduation standards, which 2    reflect the multi-cultural diversity in the city and are 3    consistent with State law, provided that for all purposes 4    of this Article courses or proficiency in American Sign 5    Language shall be deemed to constitute courses or 6    proficiency in a foreign language; and to employ 7    principals and teachers, appointed as provided in this 8    Article, and fix their compensation. The board shall 9    prepare such reports related to minimal competency testing 10    as may be requested by the State Board of Education and, in 11    addition, shall monitor and approve special education and 12    bilingual education programs and policies within the 13    district to ensure that appropriate services are provided 14    in accordance with applicable State and federal laws to 15    children requiring services and education in those areas;16        10. To employ non-teaching personnel or utilize 17    volunteer personnel for: (i) non-teaching duties not 18    requiring instructional judgment or evaluation of pupils, 19    including library duties; and (ii) supervising study 20    halls, long distance teaching reception areas used 21    incident to instructional programs transmitted by 22    electronic media such as computers, video, and audio, 23    detention and discipline areas, and school-sponsored 24    extracurricular activities. The board may further utilize 25    volunteer nonlicensed personnel or employ nonlicensed 26    personnel to assist in the instruction of pupils under the   HB3522 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    immediate supervision of a teacher holding a valid 2    educator license, directly engaged in teaching subject 3    matter or conducting activities; provided that the teacher 4    shall be continuously aware of the nonlicensed persons' 5    activities and shall be able to control or modify them. 6    The general superintendent shall determine qualifications 7    of such personnel and shall prescribe rules for 8    determining the duties and activities to be assigned to 9    such personnel;10        10.5. To utilize volunteer personnel from a regional 11    School Crisis Assistance Team (S.C.A.T.), created as part 12    of the Safe to Learn Program established pursuant to 13    Section 25 of the Illinois Violence Prevention Act of 14    1995, to provide assistance to schools in times of 15    violence or other traumatic incidents within a school 16    community by providing crisis intervention services to 17    lessen the effects of emotional trauma on individuals and 18    the community; the School Crisis Assistance Team Steering 19    Committee shall determine the qualifications for 20    volunteers;21        11. To provide television studio facilities in not to 22    exceed one school building and to provide programs for 23    educational purposes, provided, however, that the board 24    shall not construct, acquire, operate, or maintain a 25    television transmitter; to grant the use of its studio 26    facilities to a licensed television station located in the   HB3522 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    school district; and to maintain and operate not to exceed 2    one school radio transmitting station and provide programs 3    for educational purposes;4        12. To offer, if deemed appropriate, outdoor education 5    courses, including field trips within the State of 6    Illinois, or adjacent states, and to use school 7    educational funds for the expense of the said outdoor 8    educational programs, whether within the school district 9    or not;10        13. During that period of the calendar year not 11    embraced within the regular school term, to provide and 12    conduct courses in subject matters normally embraced in 13    the program of the schools during the regular school term 14    and to give regular school credit for satisfactory 15    completion by the student of such courses as may be 16    approved for credit by the State Board of Education;17        14. To insure against any loss or liability of the 18    board, the former School Board Nominating Commission, 19    Local School Councils, the Chicago Schools Academic 20    Accountability Council, or the former Subdistrict Councils 21    or of any member, officer, agent, or employee thereof, 22    resulting from alleged violations of civil rights arising 23    from incidents occurring on or after September 5, 1967 or 24    from the wrongful or negligent act or omission of any such 25    person whether occurring within or without the school 26    premises, provided the officer, agent, or employee was, at   HB3522 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    the time of the alleged violation of civil rights or 2    wrongful act or omission, acting within the scope of his 3    or her employment or under direction of the board, the 4    former School Board Nominating Commission, the Chicago 5    Schools Academic Accountability Council, Local School 6    Councils, or the former Subdistrict Councils; and to 7    provide for or participate in insurance plans for its 8    officers and employees, including, but not limited to, 9    retirement annuities, medical, surgical and 10    hospitalization benefits in such types and amounts as may 11    be determined by the board; provided, however, that the 12    board shall contract for such insurance only with an 13    insurance company authorized to do business in this State. 14    Such insurance may include provision for employees who 15    rely on treatment by prayer or spiritual means alone for 16    healing, in accordance with the tenets and practice of a 17    recognized religious denomination;18        15. To contract with the corporate authorities of any 19    municipality or the county board of any county, as the 20    case may be, to provide for the regulation of traffic in 21    parking areas of property used for school purposes, in 22    such manner as is provided by Section 11-209 of the 23    Illinois Vehicle Code;24        16. In this paragraph 16:25        "Direct admissions information" means a student's 26    name, home address, birth date, telephone number, email   HB3522 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    address, cumulative grade point average, and high school. 2        "Directory information" means a high school student's 3    name, home address, birth date, and telephone number.4        "Public institution of higher education" has the 5    meaning given to that term in the Board of Higher 6    Education Act. 7        (a) To provide, on an equal basis and consistent with 8    the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 9    1974 and the Illinois School Student Records Act, access 10    to a high school campus and student directory information 11    to the official recruiting representatives of the armed 12    forces of Illinois and the United States, to the Illinois 13    Student Assistance Commission, and to public institutions 14    of higher education for the purposes of informing students 15    of the educational and career opportunities available in 16    the military if the board has provided such access to 17    persons or groups whose purpose is to acquaint students 18    with educational or occupational opportunities available 19    to them. The board is not required to give greater notice 20    regarding the right of access to recruiting 21    representatives than is given to other persons and groups. 22    In this paragraph 16, "directory information" means a high 23    school student's name, address, and telephone number.24        (a-5) To provide, on an equal basis and consistent 25    with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 26    of 1974 and the Illinois School Student Records Act,   HB3522 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    access to student direct admissions information to the 2    Illinois Student Assistance Commission for the purpose of 3    the direct admission program. 4        (b) If a student or his or her parent or guardian 5    submits a signed, written request to the high school 6    before the end of the student's sophomore year (or if the 7    student is a transfer student, by another time set by the 8    high school) that indicates that the student or his or her 9    parent or guardian does not want the student's directory 10    information to be provided to official recruiting 11    representatives, to the Illinois Student Assistance 12    Commission, and to public institutions of higher education 13    under subparagraph subsection (a) of this paragraph 16 of 14    this Section, the high school may not provide access to 15    the student's directory information to these recruiting 16    representatives, the Illinois Student Assistance 17    Commission, and public institutions of higher education. 18    The high school shall notify its students and their 19    parents or guardians of the provisions of this 20    subparagraph subsection (b).21        (b-5) If a student who is 18 years of age or older or 22    the parent or guardian of a student under 18 years of age 23    submits a signed, written or electronic consent that 24    indicates that the student or his or her parent or 25    guardian does permit the student's direct admissions 26    information to be provided, the high school shall provide   HB3522 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    the student's direct admissions information to the 2    Illinois Student Assistance Commission.3    The Illinois Student Assistance Commission shall provide 4template opt-in language to those school districts maintaining 5grades 10 through 12, which shall be made available on the 6Commission's website no later than June 30, 2025. The template 7opt-in language shall specify that if the student or the 8student's parent or guardian provides consent, the student's 9direct admissions information will be sent to the Illinois 10Student Assistance Commission and the direct admissions 11information may, as needed for the administration of the 12direct admission program under the Public University Direct 13Admission Program Act, be redisclosed to the Board of Higher 14Education, the Illinois Community College Board, public 15universities for which the student qualifies under the direct 16admission program, the University of Illinois at 17Urbana-Champaign and the University of Illinois at Chicago if 18the student qualifies under Section 20 of the Public 19University Direct Admission Program Act, the community college 20district where the student resides, and, if applicable, a 21third party that operates a statewide student application 22portal. The template opt-in language shall also specify that 23direct admissions information may not be redisclosed to any 24other individual or entity unless the opt-in language notifies 25the student or the student's parent or guardian of such 26redisclosure and the student or the student's parent or   HB3522 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1guardian consents to the redisclosure. 2    The high school shall notify its students and their 3parents or guardians of the provisions of this subparagraph 4(b-5) and, at the time of school registration or at other 5appropriate times prior to the end of a student's junior year, 6give its students and their parents or guardians the option 7for the student information to be shared for the purpose of the 8direct admission program. 9        (c) A high school may require official recruiting 10    representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and the 11    United States to pay a fee for copying and mailing a 12    student's directory information in an amount that is not 13    more than the actual costs incurred by the high school.14        (d) Information received by an official recruiting 15    representative under this Section may be used only to 16    provide information to students concerning educational and 17    career opportunities. Information available in the 18    military and may not be released to a person who is not 19    involved in recruiting students for the armed forces of 20    Illinois or the United States or providing educational 21    opportunity information for the Board of Higher Education, 22    the Illinois Community College Board, the Illinois Student 23    Assistance Commission, or public institutions of higher 24    education.25        (e) By July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter, the 26    school district shall make student directory information   HB3522 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    electronically accessible for official recruiting 2    representatives of the armed forces of Illinois or the 3    United States, to the Illinois Student Assistance 4    Commission, and to public institutions of higher 5    education;6        (f) By July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter, the 7    school district shall make student direct admissions 8    information electronically accessible through a secure, 9    centralized data system to the Illinois Student Assistance 10    Commission for the purpose of the direct admission 11    program. 12        (g) The Board of Higher Education, the Illinois 13    Community College Board, the Illinois Student Assistance 14    Commission, and the State Board of Education may adopt any 15    rules necessary to administer this paragraph 16. 16        17. (a) To sell or market any computer program 17    developed by an employee of the school district, provided 18    that such employee developed the computer program as a 19    direct result of his or her duties with the school 20    district or through the utilization of school district 21    resources or facilities. The employee who developed the 22    computer program shall be entitled to share in the 23    proceeds of such sale or marketing of the computer 24    program. The distribution of such proceeds between the 25    employee and the school district shall be as agreed upon 26    by the employee and the school district, except that   HB3522 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    neither the employee nor the school district may receive 2    more than 90% of such proceeds. The negotiation for an 3    employee who is represented by an exclusive bargaining 4    representative may be conducted by such bargaining 5    representative at the employee's request.6        (b) For the purpose of this paragraph 17:7        (1) "Computer" means an internally programmed, general 8    purpose digital device capable of automatically accepting 9    data, processing data and supplying the results of the 10    operation.11        (2) "Computer program" means a series of coded 12    instructions or statements in a form acceptable to a 13    computer, which causes the computer to process data in 14    order to achieve a certain result.15        (3) "Proceeds" means profits derived from the 16    marketing or sale of a product after deducting the 17    expenses of developing and marketing such product;18        18. To delegate to the general superintendent of 19    schools, by resolution, the authority to approve contracts 20    and expenditures in amounts of $35,000 or less;21        19. Upon the written request of an employee, to 22    withhold from the compensation of that employee any dues, 23    payments, or contributions payable by such employee to any 24    labor organization as defined in the Illinois Educational 25    Labor Relations Act. Under such arrangement, an amount 26    shall be withheld from each regular payroll period which   HB3522 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    is equal to the pro rata share of the annual dues plus any 2    payments or contributions, and the board shall transmit 3    such withholdings to the specified labor organization 4    within 10 working days from the time of the withholding;5        19a. Upon receipt of notice from the comptroller of a 6    municipality with a population of 500,000 or more, a 7    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more, the Cook 8    County Forest Preserve District, the Chicago Park 9    District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the 10    Chicago Transit Authority, or a housing authority of a 11    municipality with a population of 500,000 or more that a 12    debt is due and owing the municipality, the county, the 13    Cook County Forest Preserve District, the Chicago Park 14    District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the 15    Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing authority by an 16    employee of the Chicago Board of Education, to withhold, 17    from the compensation of that employee, the amount of the 18    debt that is due and owing and pay the amount withheld to 19    the municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest 20    Preserve District, the Chicago Park District, the 21    Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the Chicago 22    Transit Authority, or the housing authority; provided, 23    however, that the amount deducted from any one salary or 24    wage payment shall not exceed 25% of the net amount of the 25    payment. Before the Board deducts any amount from any 26    salary or wage of an employee under this paragraph, the   HB3522 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve 2    District, the Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan 3    Water Reclamation District, the Chicago Transit Authority, 4    or the housing authority shall certify that (i) the 5    employee has been afforded an opportunity for a hearing to 6    dispute the debt that is due and owing the municipality, 7    the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve District, the 8    Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 9    District, the Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing 10    authority and (ii) the employee has received notice of a 11    wage deduction order and has been afforded an opportunity 12    for a hearing to object to the order. For purposes of this 13    paragraph, "net amount" means that part of the salary or 14    wage payment remaining after the deduction of any amounts 15    required by law to be deducted and "debt due and owing" 16    means (i) a specified sum of money owed to the 17    municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve 18    District, the Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan 19    Water Reclamation District, the Chicago Transit Authority, 20    or the housing authority for services, work, or goods, 21    after the period granted for payment has expired, or (ii) 22    a specified sum of money owed to the municipality, the 23    county, the Cook County Forest Preserve District, the 24    Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 25    District, the Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing 26    authority pursuant to a court order or order of an   HB3522 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    administrative hearing officer after the exhaustion of, or 2    the failure to exhaust, judicial review;3        20. The board is encouraged to employ a sufficient 4    number of licensed school counselors to maintain a 5    student/counselor ratio of 250 to 1. Each counselor shall 6    spend at least 75% of his work time in direct contact with 7    students and shall maintain a record of such time;8        21. To make available to students vocational and 9    career counseling and to establish 5 special career 10    counseling days for students and parents. On these days 11    representatives of local businesses and industries shall 12    be invited to the school campus and shall inform students 13    of career opportunities available to them in the various 14    businesses and industries. Special consideration shall be 15    given to counseling minority students as to career 16    opportunities available to them in various fields. For the 17    purposes of this paragraph, minority student means a 18    person who is any of the following:19        (a) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person having 20    origins in any of the original peoples of North and South 21    America, including Central America, and who maintains 22    tribal affiliation or community attachment).23        (b) Asian (a person having origins in any of the 24    original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or the 25    Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited to, 26    Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, Pakistan,   HB3522 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and Vietnam).2        (c) Black or African American (a person having origins 3    in any of the black racial groups of Africa).4        (d) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, Mexican, 5    Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or other Spanish 6    culture or origin, regardless of race).7        (e) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a 8    person having origins in any of the original peoples of 9    Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands).10        Counseling days shall not be in lieu of regular school 11    days;12        22. To report to the State Board of Education the 13    annual student dropout rate and number of students who 14    graduate from, transfer from, or otherwise leave bilingual 15    programs;16        23. Except as otherwise provided in the Abused and 17    Neglected Child Reporting Act or other applicable State or 18    federal law, to permit school officials to withhold, from 19    any person, information on the whereabouts of any child 20    removed from school premises when the child has been taken 21    into protective custody as a victim of suspected child 22    abuse. School officials shall direct such person to the 23    Department of Children and Family Services or to the local 24    law enforcement agency, if appropriate;25        24. To develop a policy, based on the current state of 26    existing school facilities, projected enrollment, and   HB3522 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    efficient utilization of available resources, for capital 2    improvement of schools and school buildings within the 3    district, addressing in that policy both the relative 4    priority for major repairs, renovations, and additions to 5    school facilities and the advisability or necessity of 6    building new school facilities or closing existing schools 7    to meet current or projected demographic patterns within 8    the district;9        25. To make available to the students in every high 10    school attendance center the ability to take all courses 11    necessary to comply with the Board of Higher Education's 12    college entrance criteria effective in 1993;13        26. To encourage mid-career changes into the teaching 14    profession, whereby qualified professionals become 15    licensed teachers, by allowing credit for professional 16    employment in related fields when determining point of 17    entry on the teacher pay scale;18        27. To provide or contract out training programs for 19    administrative personnel and principals with revised or 20    expanded duties pursuant to this Code in order to ensure 21    they have the knowledge and skills to perform their 22    duties;23        28. To establish a fund for the prioritized special 24    needs programs, and to allocate such funds and other lump 25    sum amounts to each attendance center in a manner 26    consistent with the provisions of part 4 of Section   HB3522 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    34-2.3. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 2    require any additional appropriations of State funds for 3    this purpose;4        29. (Blank);5        30. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or 6    any other law to the contrary, to contract with third 7    parties for services otherwise performed by employees, 8    including those in a bargaining unit, and to lay off 9    layoff those employees upon 14 days' days written notice 10    to the affected employees. Those contracts may be for a 11    period not to exceed 5 years and may be awarded on a 12    system-wide basis. The board may not operate more than 30 13    contract schools, provided that the board may operate an 14    additional 5 contract turnaround schools pursuant to item 15    (5.5) of subsection (d) of Section 34-8.3 of this Code, 16    and the governing bodies of contract schools are subject 17    to the Freedom of Information Act and Open Meetings Act;18        31. To promulgate rules establishing procedures 19    governing the layoff or reduction in force of employees 20    and the recall of such employees, including, but not 21    limited to, criteria for such layoffs, reductions in force 22    or recall rights of such employees and the weight to be 23    given to any particular criterion. Such criteria shall 24    take into account factors, including, but not limited to, 25    qualifications, certifications, experience, performance 26    ratings or evaluations, and any other factors relating to   HB3522 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 11387 LNS 21475 b1    an employee's job performance;2        32. To develop a policy to prevent nepotism in the 3    hiring of personnel or the selection of contractors;4        33. (Blank); and5        34. To establish a Labor Management Council to the 6    board comprised of representatives of the board, the chief 7    executive officer, and those labor organizations that are 8    the exclusive representatives of employees of the board 9    and to promulgate policies and procedures for the 10    operation of the Council.11    The specifications of the powers herein granted are not to 12be construed as exclusive, but the board shall also exercise 13all other powers that may be requisite or proper for the 14maintenance and the development of a public school system, not 15inconsistent with the other provisions of this Article or 16provisions of this Code which apply to all school districts.17    In addition to the powers herein granted and authorized to 18be exercised by the board, it shall be the duty of the board to 19review or to direct independent reviews of special education 20expenditures and services. The board shall file a report of 21such review with the General Assembly on or before May 1, 1990.22(Source: P.A. 102-465, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; revised 7-17-24.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.